Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.430

Pesticide-sensitive individuals—Notification.

(1) A certified applicator making a landscape application or a right-of-way application to the pesticide notification area, as defined in RCW 17.21.420(2), of a person on the pesticide-sensitive list shall notify the listed pesticide-sensitive individual of the application. Notification shall be made at least two hours prior to the scheduled application, or in the case of an immediate service call, the applicator shall provide notification at the time of the application.

(2) Notification under this section shall be made in writing, in person, or by telephone, and shall disclose the date and approximate time of the application. In the event a certified applicator is unable to provide prior notification because of the absence or inaccessibility of the individual, the applicator shall leave a written notice at the residence of the individual listed on the pesticide-sensitive list at the time of the application. If a person on the pesticide-sensitive list lives in a multifamily dwelling such as an apartment or condominium, the applicator shall notify the person on the list or shall advise the manager or other property owner's representative to notify the person on the list of the application.

[ 1992 c 176 s 4.]